DI-1118

DIAGNOSTICS -

MULTIPLEX COMMUNICATIONSYSTEM

CIRCUIT INSPECTION

DIAX0-01

DTC

B 1211 | Driverdoor ECU communication stop

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION
This DTC is output when communication stops between the Power window master switch (Driver door ECU)
and the Body ECU.

DTC No.

DTC Detecting Condition

Trouble Area

B1211

No cammunication fram driver doao. ECU for mose than

seconds.
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DIAGNOSTICS - MULTIPLEXCOMMUNICATIONSYSTEM
WIRING DIAGRAM
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DIAGNOSTICS - MULTIPLEXCOMMUNICATION SYSTEM
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DI-1121
DIAGNOSTICS - MULTIPLEX COMMUNICATION SYSTEM

INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 Check Power window master switch (Driver door ECU).

CHECK:

Check if the Driver door window glass move up automatically.

HINT:

With this inspection, whether or not the Power window master switch functions normally can be diagnosed.

problem symptoms table (See page DI-1063).

NG> Proceed to next circuit inspection shown on

OK

2 Check wire harness.

PREPARATION:
Pull out the ECU connectors mentioned below.
Wire harness side connector of ECU Terminal
Power window master switch (Driver door ECU) - Body ECU MPX1 (P15-7) - MPX1 (B12-24)
CHECK:
Check continuity of the wire harness between the connectors.
| Body ECU
I I
I |
((
))
L[ 1 C 1T 1
Either one of
ECU In The List L1 Power window master switch
(Driver door ECU)
T 125549

OK:

There is a continuity between the connectors.
HINT:
If there is OPEN in any wire harness, please repair it.
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DI-1122
DIAGNOSTICS

MULTIPLEX COMMUNICATION SYSTEM

NG

Repair or replace wire harness.

OK

Replace Power window master switch (Driv-
er door ECU).
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